Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4511
Insurance; offer; restrictions.

No group long-term care insurance coverage may be offered to a resident of this state under a group policy issued in another state to a group described in subdivision (4) of section 44-4508 unless this state or another state having statutory and regulatory long-term care insurance requirements substantially similar to those adopted in this state has made a determination that such requirements have been met.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 11.